Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.64.370.
Exceptions to application of chapter.

This chapter does not apply to

officers in the regular medical service of the armed services of the United States or the United States Public Health Service while in the discharge of their official duties;

a physician or osteopath, who is not a resident of this state, who is asked by a physician or osteopath licensed in this state to help in the diagnosis or treatment of a case;

the practice of the religious tenets of a church;

a physician in the regular medical service of the United States Public Health Service or the armed services of the United States volunteering services without pay or other remuneration to a hospital, clinic, medical office, or other medical facility in the state;

a person who is certified as a direct-entry midwife by the department under AS 08.65 while engaged in the practice of midwifery whether or not the person accepts compensation for those services;

a physician licensed in another state who, under a written agreement with an athletic team located in the state in which the physician is licensed, provides medical services to members of the athletic team while the athletic team is traveling to or from or participating in a sporting event in this state.

History.

(§ 35-3-97 ACLA 1949; am § 4 ch 93 SLA 1965; am § 26 ch 77 SLA 1969; am §§ 23, 24 ch 148 SLA 1970; am §§ 1, 2 ch 88 SLA 1972; am § 13 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 1985; am § 21 ch 87 SLA 1987; am § 4 ch 130 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For special permits, see 7 AAC 27, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 23, 2014, in (5), deleted “or who is excluded from registration under AS

08.65.170

(3) and (4)” preceding “while engaged in the practice”.

The 2018 amendment, effective September 16, 2018, added (6), and made a related change.

Sec. 08.64.380.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“board” means the State Medical Board;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

[Repealed, § 18 ch 29 SLA 2021.]

[Repealed, § 18 ch 29 SLA 2021.]

“opioid” includes the opium and opiate substances and opium and opiate derivatives listed in AS

11.71.140

and

11.71.160

;

“practice of medicine” or “practice of osteopathy” means:

for a fee, donation or other consideration, to diagnose, treat, operate on, prescribe for, or administer to, any human ailment, blemish, deformity, disease, disfigurement, disorder, injury, or other mental or physical condition; or to attempt to perform or represent that a person is authorized to perform any of the acts set out in this subparagraph;

to use or publicly display a title in connection with a person’s name including “doctor of medicine,” “physician,” “M.D.,” or “doctor of osteopathic medicine” or “D.O.” or a specialist designation including “surgeon,” “dermatologist,” or a similar title in such a manner as to show that the person is willing or qualified to diagnose or treat the sick or injured;

“practice of podiatry” means the medical, mechanical, and surgical treatment of ailments of the foot, the muscles and tendons of the leg governing the functions of the foot, and superficial lesions of the hand other than those associated with trauma; the use of preparations, medicines, and drugs as are necessary for the treatment of these ailments; the treatment of the local manifestations of systemic diseases as they appear in the hand and foot, except that

a patient shall be concurrently referred to a physician or osteopath for the treatment of the systemic disease itself;

general anaesthetics may be used only in colleges of podiatry approved by the board and in hospitals approved by the joint commission on the accreditation of hospitals, or the American Osteopathic Association; and

the use of X-ray or radium for therapeutic purposes is not permitted.

History.

(§§ 35-3-88, 35-3-94 ACLA 1949; am § 27 ch 77 SLA 1969; am § 3 ch 103 SLA 1970; am §§ 25 — 27 ch 148 SLA 1970; am § 9 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 117 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 85 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 21 SLA 1974; am §§ 12, 13 ch 101 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 127 SLA 1975; am § 4 ch 24 SLA 1976; am §§ 27 — 29, 41 ch 177 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 45 SLA 1982; am §§ 18, 19 ch 48 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 33 SLA 1985; am § 15 ch 6 SLA 1990; am § 26 ch 126 SLA 1990; am § 21 ch 6 SLA 1993; am § 6 ch 36 SLA 1993; am § 18 ch 2 SSSLA 2017; am § 18 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1987 to alphabetize the defined terms and in 2010 to reflect the repeal of former paragraph (5).

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Paragraph (5) was enacted as (7); renumbered in 2017, at which time paragraphs (5) and (6) were renumbered as (6) and (7).

Cross references. —

For professional designation requirements for medical practitioners and osteopaths, see AS

08.02.010

.

Administrative Code. —

For mobile intensive care paramedics, see 12 AAC 40, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 26, 2017, added (7) [now (5)].

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, repealed (3) and (4).